Louisiana, session 2026, HB928.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1578.6(B) through (D), 1730.23(A)(1) and(2), 1730.39(A) and (B)
are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 40:1578.6(E)(1)(introductory paragraph) and
1730.23(A)(3) are hereby enacted to supercede not-yet-effective provisions from Section 1
of Act 534 of the 2024 Regular Session of the Legislature to read as follows:
Page 1 of 20
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-551 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 928
§1578.6. Louisiana State Uniform Construction Code; applicability to structures;
minimum standards; existing hazardous buildings; appeal
* * *
B. The fire marshal shall review every structure or movable for compliance
with the Louisiana State Uniform Construction Code, as amended, and conduct
preliminary review within fourteen days of plan submittal, and the parish or
municipal building code enforcement officer shall be the authority having
jurisdiction to enforce compliance with the provisions other than the fire protection,
egress, and accessibility provisions of such regulations.
B. C. In addition to the provisions of Subsections A and B of this Section, the
facilities provided for in R.S. 40:1563(C)(4) Group E, Educational and Group I,
institutional occupancies, as defined by the Louisiana State Uniform Construction
Code, and state owned and leased buildings shall comply with the provisions of the
Life Safety Code of the National Fire Protection Association as promulgated by the
fire marshal in conformity with the Administrative Procedure Act.
C. D. A parish or municipality which, prior to January 1, 1975, had adopted
and is enforcing a nationally recognized model building code or fire prevention code
or a code equal to a nationally recognized building code or fire prevention code may
continue to enforce such codes in place of the codes required in the paragraph above;
however, such codes shall contain requirements that are substantially equal to the fire
marshal's code with respect to high rise buildings, mandatory automatic sprinkler and
extinguishment systems, and fire detection systems.
D. E.(1) This Section shall not apply to existing buildings, except as provided
for by R.S. 40:1641 et seq., which were lawfully constructed and maintained unless
the fire marshal deems that a serious life hazard exists due to a particular condition,
at which time the fire marshal can require the institution of proper fire protection
measures to alleviate the particular hazards noted according to either of the
following:
* * *
Page 2 of 20
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-551 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 928
§1730.23. Enforcement of building codes by municipalities, parishes, and the fire
marshal
A.(1) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary relating to the authority
of local governments to enforce construction codes, all municipalities and parishes
in this state, and the state fire marshal shall enforce only the construction codes
provided for in this Part. All municipalities and parishes shall use building code
enforcement officers or certified third-party providers contracted by the
municipality, parish, or regional planning commission to act in the capacity of a
building code enforcement officer to enforce the provisions of this Part.
Enforcement procedures by building code enforcement officers or third-party
providers acting in the capacity of a building code enforcement officer shall include
examination or review of plans, drawings, or specifications for one- and two-family
dwellings; the conducting of inspections; and the issuance, denial, or revocation of
permits. Enforcement procedures by the state fire marshal shall include the
examination or review of plans, drawings, or specifications for structures excluding
one- and two-family dwellings as defined by the International Residential Code. A
building code enforcement officer, third-party provider, or third-party provider
contracted by a jurisdiction as provided for in R.S. 40:1730.24(A) shall not conduct
plan review or inspections on a commercial or residential structure if such officer or
provider owns any interest in the legal entity that constructed such commercial or
residential structure or receives any compensation from the legal entity other than
the fees that are charged for plan review or inspections. Nothing in this Paragraph
shall be construed to prevent a commercial or residential contractor or homeowner
from using a third-party provider as provided for in R.S. 40:1730.24(B). Nothing in
this Paragraph shall be construed to prevent a commercial contractor or commercial
owner from using the office of state fire marshal as a third-party provider as
provided for in R.S. 40:1730.24(B) on commercial structures in any parish within the
state with a population of less than forty thousand and whose boundaries lie
completely north of the one hundred ten mile per hour wind line, as shown in the
Page 3 of 20
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-551 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 928
American Society of Civil Engineers (ASCE-7) basic wind speeds map published in
the latest edition of the International Building Code.
(2) No permit shall be issued for construction other than one- and two-family
dwellings until plans have been reviewed and found to comply with the applicable
provisions of this Part by the state fire marshal.
(3) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prevent the fire marshal from
enforcing the fire protection, egress, and accessibility provisions of the Louisiana
State Uniform Construction Code, excluding the provisions for one- and two-family
dwellings, as adopted by the council in accordance with R.S. 40:1730.28.
* * *
§1730.39. Powers of state fire marshal
A.(1) The state fire marshal may enter into agreements by letter of intent with
municipalities and parishes in order to provide code enforcement on behalf of the
municipality or parish as provided in R.S. 40:1730.24.
(2)(a) The agreement may include a provision that permits the The state fire
marshal to may take into consideration practical and unreasonable economic
hardships before applying the strict requirements of this Part. Pursuant to the
contractual agreement with a municipality or parish executed in accordance with the
provisions of this Subsection and upon Upon appeal equivalency proposal of by the
professional of record or the building owner for a plan review of a structure, except
one- or two-family dwellings, the state fire marshal may allow alternative materials,
design, and methods of construction and equipment. that comply with the provisions
of the International Building Code, Chapter 1-Scope and Administration, relative to
alternative materials, design, and methods of construction and equipment.
(b)(1) The state fire marshal may adopt, in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act, the provisions set forth in the International Building
Code, Chapter 1-Scope and Administration administrative sections of the referenced
codes and standards, relative to alternative materials, design, and methods of
construction and equipment.
Page 4 of 20
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-551 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 928
B. Nothing in this Part shall be construed so as to prevent the state fire
marshal from enforcing the fire protection, life safety, accessibility, and high rise
laws of this state, the enforcement of which are his statutory and regulatory
responsibility. The fire marshal shall conduct plan review of all structures excluding
one- and two-family dwellings for compliance with the provisions of this Part prior
to permit issuance and construction commencing.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 40:1573.1(A), 1574(B), 1574.1(A), (B)(1) through (3), (4)(a) and (b),
and (C)(1) and (2), 1730.23(H), 1730.24(B), 1730.31, 1730.32, 1730.33(A) and
(B)(introductory paragraph), and 1730.34(B) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
40:1730.33(C) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1573.1. Historic buildings renovation initiative
A. In order to encourage historic preservation and the preservation of
Louisiana's architectural heritage, when applying the requirements of the adopted
fire, life safety, or accessibility regulations Louisiana State Uniform Construction
Code and when implementing the applicable provisions of R.S. 40:1574, the state
fire marshal shall have the authority to take into consideration the impact of these
requirements on the historic integrity of existing facilities.
* * *
§1574. Construction or repair of structures
* * *
B. No repair, remodeling, or addition shall be made to any structure,
watercraft, or movable affecting the exits, stairs, seating arrangement, fire protection,
or other details of construction covered by this Part the Louisiana State Uniform
Construction Code until plans and specifications therefor have been submitted to and
reviewed by the fire marshal and appear to him to satisfactorily comply with the
laws, rules, regulations, and codes of the state.
* * *
§1574.1. Costs of handling plans
Page 5 of 20
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-551 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 928
A. In addition to a postage and handling fee of five dollars, the owner of the
project who submits the plans and specifications shall pay to the office of state fire
marshal, code enforcement and building safety a plan review or document fee based
on the following schedule:
(1) Assembly occupancy
Area in square feet Fee
0 - 2500 $30.00
2501 - 4500 60.00
4501 - 10,000 180.00
10,001 - 50,000 280.00
50,001 - 100,000 380.00
100,001+ 530.00
(2) Educational
Area in square feet Fee
0 - 5,000 $30.00
5001 - 10,000 60.00
10,001 - 30,000 100.00
30,001 - 80,000 200.00
80,001 - 150,000 300.00
150,001+ 400.00
(3) Health care/detention
(a) Area in square feet Fee
0 - 10,000 $ 180.00
10,001 - 20,000 280.00
20,001 - 50,000 380.00
50,001 - 100,000 480.00
100,001+ 680.00
(b) High rise (all new) 830.00
Page 6 of 20
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-551 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 928
(4) Hotels, dormitories, apartments, lodgings, rooming houses, residential
board & care facilities
(a) Area in square feet Fee
0 - 2500 $ 30.00
2501 - 10,000 60.00
10,001 - 30,000 180.00
30,001 - 80,000 280.00
80,001 - 150,000 380.00
150,001+ 480.00
(b) High rise (all new) 680.00
(5) Mercantile/business
(a) Area in square feet Fee
0 - 3000 $ 30.00
3001 - 10,000 60.00
10,001 - 30,000 90.00
30,001 - 50,000 150.00
50,001 - 150,000 200.00
150,001+ 300.00
(b) High rise (all new) 500.00
(6) Industrial, storage, special structures
Area in square feet Fee
0 - 10,000 $ 30.00
10,001 - 20,000 60.00
20,001 - 50,000 90.00
50,001 - 100,000 120.00
100,001+ 200.00
(7) Storage tank (tank installation only)
Single tank $ 50.00
Plus $30.00 for each additional tank
Page 7 of 20
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-551 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 928
(8) Sprinkler systems
(a) Number of sprinkler heads per floor
(Tenant spaces submitted separately are
considered a floor for fee purposes)
1 - 50 $ 30.00
51 - 300 60.00
301 - 450 120.00
451+ 150.00
(b) Hydraulic calculations 40.00
(c) 20 head or less shop drawing
exemption request 10.00
(9) Fire suppression systems, other than
sprinkler systems
(a) Number of devices
0 - 10 $ 30.00
11 - 25 60.00
26 - 50 120.00
51 - 75 180.00
76 - 100 200.00
101+ 300.00
(b) Calculations 40.00
(10) Fire detection and alarm systems
Number of devices Fee
(Tenant spaces submitted separately are
considered a floor for fee purposes)
0 - 25 $ 50.00
26 - 50 80.00
51 - 75 110.00
76 - 100 140.00
Page 8 of 20
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-551 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 928
101+ 140.00
Plus $30.00 for each additional 25 devices above 101
(11) Exemptions/Go-to-Work Requests
(industrial plant temporary trailers/modulars,
nonrequired/nonconforming fire protection
system requests, architectural modifications)
Per request $ 20.00
(12)(a) Facsimile transmissions and record requests Fee
Paper copies per page $ 2.00
Fax per page 4.00
Electronic copies (per floppy diskette) 25.00
Database report (plus $100.00 per every
1000 records) 500.00
(b) However, postage and handling fees
shall not apply to exemption requests and
facsimile transmissions.
(13) Appeal requests Fee
(a) Accessibility $ 25.00
(b) Life safety/fire code appeals:
(i) Smoke control reviews ($50.00 for
resubmission) 100.00
(ii) Timed egress ($50.00 for resubmission) 100.00
(iii) Other appeals ($50.00 for resubmission) 100.00
(14) The fee for performance-based reviews shall be
twice the amount of the review fees imposed by
this Subsection, plus an additional fee of $100.00
($50.00 for resubmission) for smoke control reviews
and timed egress.
Page 9 of 20
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-551 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 928
The state fire marshal may establish by rule, in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act, reasonable plan review fees in order to implement
the provisions of this Part, not to exceed the following:
(1) For buildings of two thousand square feet or less, five hundred dollars.
(2) For buildings over two thousand square feet, thirty cents per square foot.
(3) For code equivalency review, two hundred dollars per review.
(4) For sprinkler systems, not to exceed four hundred dollars for up to four
hundred fifty heads, and not exceeding thirty cents for each additional head over
four hundred fifty heads.
(5) For fire suppression, not to exceed three hundred dollars for up to one
hundred heads, and not exceeding thirty cents for each additional head over one
hundred heads.
(6) For fire detection and alarm systems, not to exceed one hundred fifty
dollars for up to one hundred devices, and not exceeding thirty dollars for each
additional group of twenty-five devices over one hundred devices.
(7) For fuel storage tanks, not to exceed seventy-five dollars for a single
tank, and not exceeding forty dollars for each additional tank.
(8) For conveyance devices, not to exceed two hundred dollars for a single
conveyance device, and not exceeding one hundred fifty dollars for each
additional conveyance device.
B.(1) In order to comply with the requirements of R.S. 40:1574, only one
set of plans complete set of construction documents shall be submitted
electronically to the state fire marshal for review.
(2) When the plans are reviewed by the office of state fire marshal, code
enforcement and building safety, the original set of plans properly stamped
"Reviewed" by the state fire marshal shall be retained by the contractor for the
construction, renovation, or remodeling for the project in question as long as the
structure, watercraft, or movable is in the process of construction, renovation, or
remodeling.
Page 10 of 20
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-551 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 928
(3) Upon final completion of the project the contractor shall turn the plans
over to the owner.
(4)(2)(a) The state fire marshal shall furnish to the parties submitting the
plans which appear to him to satisfactorily comply with the laws, rules,
regulations, and codes of the state and the regulations of the state fire marshal
the original set of plans, blueprints, or both stamped an electronic copy of the
construction documents marked as reviewed along with a letter which shall state
that the plans appear to him to satisfactorily comply with the laws, rules,
regulations, and codes of the state and the regulations of the fire marshal.
(b) This letter from the fire marshal stating that the plans and specifications
for the construction, renovation, or remodeling for the project in question appear
to satisfactorily comply with the laws, rules, regulations, and codes of the state,
in no way permits and authorizes any omission or deviation from those laws,
rules, regulations, and codes so that in no way does this review procedure permit,
authorize, or otherwise increase or incur any liability by the state for failure to
recognize and point out any such omission or deviation in those requirements.
C.(1) In the event that plans do not appear to the fire marshal to
satisfactorily comply with the laws, regulations, and codes of Louisiana and the
regulations of the state fire marshal, the state fire marshal shall furnish a letter
to the party submitting the plans which shall list the particular requirements of
the state fire marshal which must be met before the plans can be stamped
"Reviewed" released for permitting and before construction or renovation or
remodeling can begin. However, where plans for projects are submitted in
violation of R.S. 37:155(A)(4), no list of requirements shall be provided.
(2) Review of the plans submitted constitutes compliance with this Section
if construction begins a building permit is issued within one hundred eighty days
of the review.
* * *
Page 11 of 20
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-551 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 928
§1730.23. Enforcement of building codes by municipalities, parishes, and the fire
marshal
* * *
H. A parish or municipality may shall accept determinations made by the state
fire marshal as they pertain to life safety and fire protection as required in this Part.
* * *
§1730.24. Agreements with other governmental entities for provision of services;
private agreements
* * *
B. Commercial and residential contractors and homeowners who are excepted
from the contractor licensing law under R.S. 37:2170 may establish agreements with
certified third-party providers to conduct plans review and inspections and enforce the
state uniform construction code. On and after January 1, 2007, a third-party provider
shall meet the requirements imposed by the council for certificates of registration;
however, beginning January 1, 2008, upon application and fulfillment of all other
requirements necessary to obtain a certificate of registration, a third-party provider
who is a Louisiana licensed architect or engineer shall be granted a certificate of
registration without certification by a recognized code organization. Once the council
meets for the first time, certified third-party providers shall notify the council of their
intention to do business within the state, and the council shall maintain a listing of all
certified third-party providers.
* * *
§1730.31. Mandamus and injunctive relief for violation of code or regulation;
penalties
For a violation of the building codes or regulations adopted pursuant to this Part,
the local building official may enjoin further construction of the project as provided
by local ordinance. The municipal, district, or parish attorney, attorney general, state
fire marshal, or other appropriate authorities of a political subdivision, in addition to
Page 12 of 20
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-551 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 928
other remedies, may apply for injunctive relief, mandamus, or other appropriate
proceeding in the district court of the parish where the violation occurred.
§1730.32. Imposition of fees
Nothing in this Part shall prohibit the governing authority of a parish or
municipality, or the state fire marshal from imposing fees necessary to implement and
continue the provisions required by this Part as provided by law.
§1730.33. Codes applicable to building inspections
A. The requirements of the codes in effect at the time of plan submittal to the
office of state fire marshal plan review section shall apply to the inspections of
buildings other than one- and two-family dwellings. The editions established by plan
review are valid if a permit for construction is issued within one hundred eighty
calendar days of the plan review letter.
B. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, an inspector shall conduct a
one- and two-family building inspection using the requirements of the codes in effect
for the locality on the date of the issuance of the original building permit when
performing inspections on residential structures for the purposes of allowing
occupancy and reconnecting utilities. When conducting inspections to allow
occupancy or reconnecting utilities to an existing residential structure, the intent of the
inspection is to ascertain the general safety of the structure and its appropriateness for
occupancy.
* * *
B. C. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to authorize an inspector to have
or use discretion in determining what codes shall apply to an inspection pursuant to
this Part.

§1730.34. Responsibility of Louisiana State Construction Code Council for
registration of building codes enforcement officers; record of hearings and
proceedings; register of applications for certificates of registration
* * *
Page 13 of 20
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-551 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 928
B. The council or its designated representatives may conduct hearings and
proceedings required by law or considered necessary by the council. The council and
its members shall be subject to the Open Meetings Law, the Public Records Law, and
the Code of Governmental Ethics, provided however, that when any member of the
council has a real or perceived conflict of interest upon an issue before the council, he
shall recuse himself from participation in that issue by providing a verbal explanation
of the real or perceived conflict to the council. The Department of Public Safety and
Corrections shall employ and supervise personnel necessary for the administration of
this Part. The council may promulgate regulations under the provisions of the
Administrative Procedure Act for the proper enforcement of this Part.
* * *
Section 3. R.S. 40:1574.1(B)(4)(c), (5), and (6) are hereby repealed in their entirety.
Section 4. The provisions of Section 1 of this Act supercede the provisions of Section
1 of Act No. 534 of the 2024 Regular Session of the Legislature that amend and reenact R.S.
40:1578.6(B), (C), and (D)(1)(introductory paragraph), and 1730.23(A)(1) to the extent that
Section 1 of this Act conflicts with Section 1 of Act No. 534 of the 2024 Regular Session
of the Legislature.
Section 5. The provisions of Section 1 of this Act shall become effective when Section
1 of Act No. 534 of the 2024 Regular Session of the Legislature becomes effective.